Hawaii statutes.
[§172-13 Destruction, defacing or removal
of survey monuments; penalty.] It shall be unlawful, without the written
consent of the state comptroller, for any person to destroy, deface, change, or
remove to another place, any trigonometrical survey station, boundary line mark
or monument, corner post, or any other government line of survey, or to cut
down any witness tree or any tree blazed to mark the line of a government
survey, or any bench mark in any government survey. Any person who violates
this chapter, shall be fined not more than $500, or imprisoned not more than
four months, or both. [L 1911, c 106, §1; RL 1925, §4304; RL 1935, §5780; RL
1945, §11170; RL 1955, §274-1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12; HRS §732-1; ren L
1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, 663.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next